Hawaii statutes.
[§414D-307] Report of indemnification to
members. If a corporation indemnifies or advances expenses to a director
under sections 414D‑160 to 414D‑163, in connection with a
proceeding by or in the right of the corporation, the corporation shall report
the indemnification or advance in writing to the members with or before the
notice of the next meeting of members. [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next